Hawaii statutes.
§431:10G-106 Verification of insurance.
Every insurer shall issue to each of its insureds a proof of insurance card for
each motorcycle or motor scooter for which a liability policy under this
article is written. The proof of insurance card shall show the following:

(1) Name, make, year, and factory or serial number of
the motorcycle or motor scooter; provided that insurers of five or more
motorcycles or motor scooters that are under common registered ownership and
used in the regular course of business shall not be required to indicate the
name, make, year, and the factory or serial number of each motorcycle or motor
scooter;

(2) Policy number;

(3) Names of the insured and the insurer; and

(4) Effective dates of coverage including the
expiration date.

The proof of insurance card shall be carried on the
person operating the insured motorcycle or motor scooter at all times and shall
be exhibited to a law enforcement officer upon demand. [L 1989, c 208, pt of
§1; am L 2004, c 122, §59]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next